District of Columbia statutes.
5-715

Application of amendment to § 5-714.

The amendment made by Pub. L. 96-122, § 205(a)(2)(B), to § 5-714 shall apply with respect to income from wages or self-employment, or both, received directly or indirectly during calendar year 1979 or the calendar year after the year in which the member retires, whichever is later, and any calendar year thereafter.

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 205(c)
1973 Ed., § 4-530.1.
1981 Ed., § 4-621.